Massachusetts, session 194th, H1211.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Insert a new section 6B, Panic Alarm, to Chapter 167B of the General Laws as follows.
Section 6B. Within one (1) year of passage, every electronic branch will be equipped
with a panic alarm. This panic alarm must be operated by a button labelled “EMERGENCY”,
similar to the cancel and clear buttons. When activated the electronic branch will (i) immediately
cease operation for at least one (1) hour without notice that the panic alarm is active; (ii) retain
any access device within its control; and (iii) transmit a panic alarm to the police having
jurisdiction and upload any and all video from the electronic branch in a format approved by the
state 911 department.

of 1